Tennessee, session 114, HB2526.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-102(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Child in need of heightened supervision" means a child who a court
determines:
(A) Has exhibited or threatened violent behavior consistent with an
offense enumerated in § 37-1-131(a)(2)(B)(i) or § 39-14-202, regardless of
whether a petition has been filed alleging the child committed a delinquent act
and regardless of the child's adjudication or diversion status; or
(B) Is incompetent to be adjudicated delinquent but has exhibited
behavior consistent with a violent offense or an attempt to commit a violent
offense, including offenses enumerated in § 37-1-131(a)(2)(B)(i) and § 39-14-
202;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-114(c), is amended by
redesignating the current subdivisions (c)(7) and (c)(8) as subdivisions (c)(8) and (c)(9) and
adding the following as a new subdivision (c)(7):
(7) There is probable cause to believe the child is a child in need of heightened
supervision;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-114(c), is amended by deleting
"listed in subdivisions (c)(1)-(6)" and substituting "listed in subdivisions (c)(1)-(7)".
HB2526
011269
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-116(a), is amended by deleting
"delinquent or unruly" and substituting "delinquent, unruly, or a child in need of heightened
supervision".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-116(d), is amended by deleting
"alleged to be delinquent" and substituting "alleged to be delinquent, unless the child is also a
child in need of heightened supervision".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-116(k)(1), is amended by
deleting "unless the following" and substituting "unless the child is also a child in need of
heightened supervision or the following".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-130(b), is amended by deleting
"to be delinquent" and substituting "to be delinquent or a child in need of heightened
supervision".
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-137(b)(1), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(D)
(i) The child is alleged to have committed an assault against a staff
member at the child's residential placement. If the child is found to have
committed such an assault following a disciplinary offense hearing or if the child
is adjudicated delinquent for an assault that was committed against a staff
member at the child's residential placement, then the child's indefinite
commitment must not be discharged and the child must not be placed on home
placement supervision for an additional six (6) months from the date of the
assault.
(ii) A child committed to the custody of the department for an indefinite
time must be informed of this subdivision (b)(1)(D) upon commitment.
- 2 - 011269

SECTION 9. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011269